Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.160

GET ready for math and science scholarship program—Tuition units—Ownership and redemption.

Ownership of tuition units purchased by the office for the GET ready for math and science scholarship program under RCW 28B.105.070 shall be in the name of the state of Washington and may be redeemed by the state of Washington on behalf of recipients of GET ready for math and science scholarship program scholarships for tuition and fees except that during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium any unused tuition units may be used for the college bound scholarship program established in chapter 28B.118 RCW.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 962; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 173; 2007 c 214 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.